Georgia, session 2025_26, HB763.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
28 SECTION 1.
29 Short title.
30 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Richmond Hill-Bryan County Airport
31 Authority Act."
32 SECTION 2.
33 Richmond Hill-Bryan County Airport Authority; creation.
34 There is created a body corporate and politic to be known as the Richmond Hill-Bryan
35 County Airport Authority, which shall be deemed to be a political subdivision of the State
36 of Georgia and a public corporation by that name, style, and title, and said body may contract
37 and be contracted with, bring and defend actions, implead and be impleaded, and complain
38 and defend in all courts of law and equity, except that the authority of the trustee acting under
39 the trust indenture herein provided for shall in no event be liable for any torts committed by
H. B. 763
- 2 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
40 any of the officers, agents, and employees of the authority. The authority shall have
41 perpetual existence.
42 SECTION 3.
43 Membership.
44 (a) The Richmond Hill-Bryan County Airport Authority shall be composed of 11 members.
45 (b) Seven members shall be appointed by the governing authorities of the County of Bryan
46 and City of Richmond Hill. Within 60 days after the approval of this Act, it shall be the duty
47 of said governing authorities to appoint the members of the authority to Post No. 1, Post
48 No. 2, Post No. 3, Post No. 4, Post No. 5, Post No. 6, and Post No. 7 as follows:
49 (1) The County Manager of Bryan County or his or her designee shall be appointed to
50 Post No. 1;
51 (2) The City Manager for the City of Richmond Hill or his or her designee shall be
52 appointed to Post No. 2;
53 (3) The members from Post No. 3 and Post No. 5 shall be appointed by the governing
54 authority of Bryan County;
55 (4) The members from Post No. 4 and Post No. 6 shall be appointed by the governing
56 authority of the City of Richmond Hill; and
57 (5) The initial member from Post No. 7 shall be appointed by the governing authority of
58 the City of Richmond Hill; thereafter, such member from Post No. 7 shall be appointed
59 by the governing authority of Bryan County. Future appointments to Post No. 7 shall
60 alternate between the governing authority of the City of Richmond Hill and the governing
61 authority of Bryan County.
62 (c) Four members of the authority shall by appointed by the legislative delegation of Bryan
63 County. The members appointed by the legislative delegation of Bryan County may be
64 residents or nonresidents of Bryan County. The term of the members appointed by the
H. B. 763
- 3 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
65 legislative delegation of Bryan County shall be four years and until a successor is appointed
66 and qualified. Members appointed by the legislative delegation of Bryan County may
67 succeed themselves.
68 (d) For Posts No. 1 and 2, the term of office shall be as long as the member holds the
69 position of county manager and city manager, respectively. For Posts No. 3 through 7, the
70 term of office of each member shall be four years and until a successor is appointed and
71 qualified. Following initial appointments, vacancies in each post shall be filled by the
72 governing authority making the appointment. Vacancies for the offices of the members
73 appointed by the legislative delegation shall be filled by the legislative delegation appointing
74 a member to the vacancy. Members appointed to fill vacancies shall serve for the remainder
75 of the vacant member's term.
76 SECTION 4.
77 Meetings.
78 The authority shall hold its first organizational meeting on or before April 30, 2026, at 10:00
79 A.M. in the City Hall, 40 Richmond R. Davis Drive, Richmond Hill, Georgia. Notice of such
80 meeting shall be given to the legal organ of the County of Bryan not less than 15 days prior
81 thereto, and a notice shall be posted on the website for the County of Bryan and the City of
82 Richmond Hill. Thereafter, the authority shall meet at such times as may be necessary to
83 transact the business coming before it, but not less than quarterly. All meetings shall be
84 called, noticed, and conducted in accordance with Chapter 14 of Title 50 of the O.C.G.A.,
85 the "Open Meetings Law." At its first organizational meeting and its first regular meeting
86 in January of each year thereafter, the authority shall elect one of its members as its
87 chairperson and another member as secretary-treasurer. It shall be the duty of the
88 secretary-treasurer to prepare or oversee the preparation of written minutes of all meetings
89 of the authority. Only one person shall hold the office of secretary-treasurer. These officers
H. B. 763
- 4 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
90 shall be elected for a term ending on December 31 of the year in which they were elected or
91 until their successors are elected and qualified. Four members of the authority shall
92 constitute a quorum for the transaction of all business coming before it. The members of the
93 authority may be compensated as determined from time to time by said governing
94 authorities; however, it is expressly provided that they shall be reimbursed for all actual,
95 reasonable, and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.
96 SECTION 5.
97 Vacancies in office.
98 In the event of a vacancy on the authority by reason of death, resignation, or otherwise, the
99 vacancy shall be filled by the governing authority which appointed such member, and the
100 person so appointed shall serve for the remainder of the unexpired term.
101 SECTION 6.
102 Definitions.
103 (a) As used in this Act, the term:
104 (1) "Authority" means the Richmond Hill-Bryan County Airport Authority created in
105 Section 2 of this Act.
106 (2) "Cost of the project" means the cost of construction; the cost of all lands, properties,
107 rights, easements, and franchises acquired; the cost of all machinery, equipment,
108 financing charges, and interest prior to and during construction; the cost of engineering,
109 architectural, fiscal, and legal expenses; the cost of plans and specifications; and such
110 other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the financing herein authorized, the
111 construction or improvement of any project, and the placing of the same in operation.
112 Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be regarded
H. B. 763
- 5 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
113 as a part of the cost of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of any funds
114 of the authority including the proceeds from any revenue bonds issued under the
115 provisions of this Act for any such project or projects.
116 (3) "Project" means and includes the leasing, acquisition, construction, equipping,
117 maintenance, improving, and operation of public airports and landing fields for the use
118 of aircraft, related buildings, and the usual and convenient facilities appertaining to such
119 undertakings; extensions and improvements of such facilities; the acquisition of necessary
120 property, both real and personal; and the lease and sale of any part of or all of such
121 facilities, including real and personal property, so as to assure the efficient and proper
122 development, maintenance, and operation of such airports and landing fields for the use
123 of aircraft, deemed by the authority to be necessary, convenient, or desirable for the
124 operation of such airports and landing fields anywhere within Bryan County.
125 (4) "Revenue bonds," "bonds," or "obligations" mean revenue bonds as defined and
126 provided for in Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36 of the O.C.G.A., the "Revenue Bond
127 Law," and such type of obligations may be issued by the authority as authorized under
128 said "Revenue Bond Law" and any amendments thereto, and in addition shall also mean
129 obligations of the authority the issuance of which are hereinafter authorized in this Act.
130 (b) Any project shall be deemed "self-liquidating" if, in the judgment of the authority, the
131 revenues and earnings to be derived by the authority therefrom and all properties used,
132 leased, and sold in connection therewith will be sufficient to pay the cost of constructing,
133 operating, maintaining, repairing, improving, and extending the project and to pay the
134 principal and interest of the revenue bonds which may be issued to finance, in whole or in
135 part, the cost of such project or projects.
H. B. 763
- 6 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
136 SECTION 7.
137 Powers.
138 (a) The authority shall have power:
139 (1) To have a seal and alter the same at its pleasure;
140 (2) To acquire by purchase, lease, or otherwise and to hold, lease, and dispose of real and
141 personal property of every kind and character for its corporate purposes;
142 (3) To acquire in its own name by purchase, gift, or otherwise on such terms and
143 conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper, real property or rights or easements
144 therein or franchises necessary or convenient for its corporate purposes, and to use the
145 same so long as its corporate existence shall continue, and to lease or make contracts with
146 respect to the use of or disposition of the same in any manner it deems to the best
147 advantage of the authority;
148 (4) To appoint, select, and employ officers and employees, or, in the alternative, the
149 authority may contract with the City of Richmond Hill for its officers and employees or
150 may contract with the city for personnel services and benefits, including payroll,
151 insurance, and retirement programs. The authority may enter into contracts with
152 consultants and independent contractors, including engineering, architectural, and
153 construction experts, fiscal agents, and attorneys, and fix their respective compensation;
154 (5) To make contracts and leases and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient
155 including contracts for construction of projects or leases of projects or contracts with
156 respect to the use of projects which it causes to be erected or acquired and any and all
157 persons, firms, and corporations and any and all political subdivisions, departments,
158 institutions, or agencies of the state are authorized to enter into contracts, leases, or
159 agreements with the authority upon such terms and for such purposes as they may deem
160 advisable; the authority is further granted the authority to make contracts, leases, and to
161 execute all instruments necessary or convenient with the United States government or any
H. B. 763
- 7 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
162 agency or department thereof concerning the projects of the authority, subject to the
163 rights and interests of the holder of any of the bonds or obligations authorized to be
164 issued hereunder, and by the resolution or trust indenture of the authority authorizing the
165 issuance of any of its bonds or obligations as provided for in this Act;
166 (6) To construct, erect, acquire, own, repair, remodel, maintain, add to, extend, improve,
167 equip, operate, and manage projects, as hereinabove defined, the cost of any such project
168 to be paid in whole or in part from the proceeds of revenue bonds or other funds of the
169 authority or from such proceeds or other funds and any grant from the United States of
170 America, State of Georgia, County of Bryan, City of Richmond Hill, or any agency or
171 instrumentality thereof;
172 (7) To accept loans and grants, or to accept loans or grants of money or materials or
173 property of any kind from the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality
174 or political subdivision thereof or from any other source, upon such terms and conditions
175 as the United States of America or such agency or instrumentality or other source may
176 impose;
177 (8) To accept loans and grants, or to accept loans or grants of money or materials or
178 property of any kind from the State of Georgia or any agency or instrumentality or
179 political subdivision thereof or from any other source, upon such terms and conditions
180 as the State of Georgia or such agency or instrumentality or political subdivision or any
181 other source may impose;
182 (9) To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes and to execute evidence of such
183 indebtedness by promissory notes, or otherwise, and to secure the same and to issue
184 negotiable revenue bonds payable solely from funds pledged for that purpose, and to
185 provide for the payment of the same and for the rights of the holders thereof;
186 (10) To exercise any power usually possessed by private corporations performing similar
187 functions, which is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of this state, except the
188 right of eminent domain;
H. B. 763
- 8 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
189 (11) The authority and the trustee acting under the trust indenture are specifically
190 authorized from time to time to sell, lease, grant, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any
191 surplus property, both real or personal, or interest therein not required in the normal
192 operation of and usable in the furtherance of the purpose for which the authority was
193 created;
194 (12) To do all things necessary or convenient to exercise and carry out the powers
195 especially given in this Act;
196 (13) To make rules and bylaws for the orderly operation of the authority; and
197 (14) To request the city or county to exercise the power of eminent domain to acquire
198 any private real property or any rights or interests therein including any easements, as
199 necessary or convenient for the accomplishment of the purposes of this Act, in
200 accordance with the provisions of any and all existing laws applicable to the exercise of
201 such power. The authority shall pay the condemning authority for any property
202 condemned under this power, including legal fees and expenses (such as surveys and
203 appraisals), from its own funds and in proceedings to condemn pursuant to this section,
204 the court having jurisdiction of the suit, action, or proceeding may enter such orders
205 regarding the payment for such property or interest therein as may be fair and just to the
206 city or county, the authority, and the owners of the property being condemned. Any such
207 procedure may suggest the method of payment by the authority to persons who shall own
208 or have an interest in the property.
209 (b) The authority, notwithstanding any other provision herein to the contrary, is authorized
210 to exercise each and every power conferred upon it by this Act, specifically including the
211 issuance of revenue bonds, both within and outside the confines of Bryan County, and to
212 contract with any other entity, governmental or otherwise, for the joint acquisition,
213 construction, use, or operation of airports and related facilities outside the limits of Bryan
214 County. Prior to exercising any of said powers outside the limits of Bryan County, said
H. B. 763
- 9 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
215 authority shall be required to obtain the approval of the governing authorities of both the City
216 of Richmond Hill and Bryan County.
217 SECTION 8.
218 Revenue bonds.
219 The authority, or any authority or body which has or which may in the future succeed to the
220 powers, duties, and liabilities vested in the authority created hereby, shall have power and
221 is authorized at one time, or from time to time, to provide by resolution for the issuance of
222 negotiable revenue bonds, for the purpose of paying all or any part of the cost as herein
223 defined of any one or more projects. The principal and interest of such revenue bonds shall
224 be payable solely from the special fund herein provided for such payment. The bonds of
225 each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at such rate or rates as may be authorized by the
226 authority from time to time, shall be payable as provided by resolution of the authority, shall
227 mature at such time or times not exceeding 30 years from their date or dates, shall be payable
228 in such medium of payment as to both principal and interest as may be determined by the
229 authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity at the option of the authority, at such
230 price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority in the
231 resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds. Such revenue bonds or obligations shall
232 be issued pursuant to and in conformity with Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36 of the
233 O.C.G.A., the "Revenue Bond Law," and all procedures pertaining to such issuance and the
234 conditions thereof shall be the same as those contained in said "Revenue Bond Law" and any
235 amendments thereof.
H. B. 763
- 10 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
236 SECTION 9.
237 Form, denominations, registration, place of payment.
238 The authority shall determine the form of the bonds, shall fix the denomination or
239 denominations of the bonds, and the place or places of payment of principal and interest
240 thereof, which may be at any bank or trust company within or outside the state. The bonds
241 may be issued in coupon or registered form, or both, as the authority may determine, and
242 provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bond as to principal alone and also
243 as to both the principal and interest.
244 SECTION 10.
245 Signatures, seal.
246 In case any officer whose signature shall appear on any bonds or whose facsimile signature
247 shall appear on any coupon shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds,
248 such signature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he or
249 she had remained in office until such delivery. All such bonds shall be signed by the
250 chairperson of the authority and attested by the secretary-treasurer of the authority, and the
251 official seal of the authority shall be affixed thereto, and any coupons attached thereto shall
252 bear the facsimile signatures of the chairperson and secretary-treasurer of the authority. Any
253 bond may be signed, sealed, and attested on behalf of the authority by such persons as at the
254 actual time of the execution of such bonds shall be duly authorized or hold the proper office,
255 although at the date of delivery and payment of such bonds such persons may not have been
256 so authorized or shall not have held such office.
H. B. 763
- 11 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
257 SECTION 11.
258 Negotiability, exemption from taxation.
259 All revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this Act shall have and are declared to have
260 all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the negotiable instrument law
261 of the state. Such bonds are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental
262 purpose and the said bonds, their transfer, and the income thereof shall be exempt from all
263 taxation within the state.
264 SECTION 12.
265 Sale, price.
266 The authority may sell such bonds in such manner and for such price as it may determine to
267 be in the best interest of the authority.
268 SECTION 13.
269 Proceeds of bonds.
270 The proceeds of such bonds shall be used solely for the payment of the cost of the project or
271 projects, and unless otherwise provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the
272 bonds or in the trust indenture, additional bonds may in like manner be issued to provide the
273 amount of any deficit for the cost of the project or projects which, unless otherwise provided
274 in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture, shall be
275 deemed to be of the same issue and shall be entitled to payment from the same fund without
276 preference or priority of the bonds first issued for the same purposes. If the proceeds of the
277 bonds of any issue shall exceed the amount required for the purpose for which such bonds
278 are issued, the surplus shall be paid into a sinking fund or used for additional construction
H. B. 763
- 12 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
279 as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust
280 indenture.
281 SECTION 14.
282 Interim receipts and certificates or temporary bonds.
283 Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority may, under like restrictions, issue
284 interim receipts, interim certificates, or temporary bonds, with or without coupons
285 exchangeable for definitive bonds upon the issuance of the latter.
286 SECTION 15.
287 Replacement of lost or mutilated bonds.
288 The authority may also provide for the replacement of any bond which shall become
289 mutilated or be destroyed or lost.
290 SECTION 16.
291 Conditions precedent to issuance, object of issuance.
292 Such revenue bonds may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any
293 conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions, and things which are specified
294 or required by this Act. In the discretion of the authority, revenue bonds of a single issue
295 may be issued for the purpose of any particular project. Any resolution providing for the
296 issuance of revenue bonds under the provisions of this Act shall become effective
297 immediately upon its passage and need not be published or posted, and any such resolution
298 may be passed at any regular or special or adjourned meeting of the authority by a majority
299 of the quorum as in this Act provided.
H. B. 763
- 13 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
300 SECTION 17.
301 Credit not pledged.
302 Revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this Act shall not be deemed to constitute a
303 debt of either the City of Richmond Hill or Bryan County, or any municipality therein, but
304 such bonds shall be payable solely from the fund hereinafter provided for and the issuance
305 of such revenue bonds shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the said city or
306 county, or any municipality therein, to levy or to pledge any form of taxation whatever
307 therefor or to make any appropriation for such payment, and all such bonds shall contain
308 recitals on their face covering substantially the foregoing provisions of this section.
309 SECTION 18.
310 Trust indenture as security.
311 In the discretion of the authority, any issue of such revenue bonds may be secured by a trust
312 indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust
313 company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside of the state. Such
314 trust indenture may pledge or assign fees, tolls, revenues, and earnings to be received by the
315 authority, including the proceeds derived from the sale from time to time of any surplus
316 property of the authority, both real and personal. Either the resolution providing for the
317 issuance of revenue bonds or such trust indenture may contain such provisions for protecting
318 and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper
319 and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the authority in
320 relation to the acquisition of property, the construction of the project, the maintenance,
321 operation, repair, and insuring of the property, and the custody, safeguarding, and application
322 of all moneys, including the proceeds derived from the sale or lease of property of the
323 authority, both real and personal, and may also provide that any project shall be constructed
H. B. 763
- 14 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
324 and paid for under the supervision and approval of consulting engineers or architects
325 employed or designated by the authority, and satisfactory to the original purchasers of the
326 bonds issued therefor and may also require that the security given by contractors and by any
327 depository of the proceeds of the bonds or revenues or other moneys be satisfactory to such
328 purchasers, and may also contain provisions concerning the conditions, if any, upon which
329 additional revenue bonds may be issued. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company
330 incorporated under the laws of this state to act as such depository and to furnish such
331 indemnifying bonds or pledge such securities as may be required by the authority. Such
332 indenture may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee and may
333 restrict the individual right of action of bondholders as is customary in trust indentures
334 securing bonds and debentures of corporations. In addition to the foregoing, such trust
335 indenture may contain such other provisions as the authority may deem reasonable and
336 proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out such trust
337 indenture may be treated as a part of the cost of maintenance, operation, and repair of the
338 project affected by such indenture.
339 SECTION 19.
340 To whom proceeds of bonds shall be paid.
341 The authority shall, in the resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds or in the
342 trust indenture, provide for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds to any officer
343 or person who, or any agency, bank, or trust company which, shall act as trustee of such
344 funds to hold and apply the same to the purposes thereof, subject to such regulations as this
345 Act and such resolutions or trust indentures may provide.
H. B. 763
- 15 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
346 SECTION 20.
347 Sinking fund.
348 The revenues, fees, tolls, and earnings derived from any particular project or projects,
349 regardless of whether or not such fees, earnings, and revenues were produced by a particular
350 project for which bonds have been issued and any moneys derived from the sale or lease of
351 any properties, both real and personal, of the authority, unless otherwise pledged and
352 allocated, may be pledged and allocated by the authority to the payment of the principal and
353 interest on such revenue bonds of the authority as the resolution authorizing the issuance of
354 the bonds or the trust instrument may provide, and such funds so pledged from whatever
355 source received, which said pledge may include funds received from one or more or all
356 sources, shall be set aside at regular intervals as may be provided in the resolution or trust
357 indenture into a sinking fund, which said sinking fund shall be pledged to, and charged with,
358 the payment of:
359 (1) The interest upon such revenue bonds as such interest shall fall due;
360 (2) The principal of the bonds as the same shall fall due;
361 (3) The necessary charges of a paying agent or agents for paying interest and principal;
362 (4) Any premium upon bonds retired by call or purchase as hereinabove provided; and
363 (5) Any other reasonable or necessary costs or expenses relating to such bond issue.
364 The use and disposition of such sinking fund shall be subject to such regulations as may be
365 provided in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds or in the trust
366 indenture, however, except as may otherwise be provided in such resolution or trust
367 indenture, such sinking fund shall be a fund for the benefit of all revenue bonds without
368 distinction or priority of one over another. Subject to the provisions of the resolution
369 authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust indenture, surplus moneys in the sinking
370 fund may be applied to the purchase or redemption of bonds and any such bonds so
371 purchased or redeemed shall forthwith be canceled and shall not again be issued.
H. B. 763
- 16 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
372 SECTION 21.
373 Remedies of bondholders.
374 Any holder of revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this Act or any of the coupons
375 appertaining thereto, and the trustee under the trust indenture, if any, except to the extent the
376 rights herein given may be restricted by resolution passed before the issuance of the bonds
377 or by the trust indenture, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other
378 proceedings protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the State of Georgia or
379 granted hereunder or under such resolution or trust indenture, and may enforce and compel
380 performance of all duties required by this Act or by such resolution or trust indenture, to be
381 performed by the authority, or any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging, and
382 collecting of revenues, fees, tolls, and other charges for the use of the facilities and services
383 furnished.
384 SECTION 22.
385 Refunding bonds.
386 The authority is authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance of revenue refunding
387 bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any revenue bonds issued under the
388 provisions of this Act and then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon. The
389 issuance of such revenue refunding bonds, the maturities, and all other details thereof, the
390 rights of the holders thereof, and the duties of the authority in respect to the same shall be
391 governed by the foregoing provisions of this Act insofar as the same may be applicable.
H. B. 763
- 17 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
392 SECTION 23.
393 Validation.
394 Bonds of the authority shall be confirmed and validated in accordance with said "Revenue
395 Bond Law." The petition for validation shall also make party defendant to such action any
396 municipality, county, authority, subdivision, or instrumentality of the State of Georgia or the
397 United States government or any department or agency of the United States government, if
398 subject to be sued, which has contracted with the authority for the services and facilities of
399 the project for which bonds are to be issued and sought to be validated and such
400 municipality, county, authority, subdivision, or instrumentality shall be required to show
401 cause, if any, why such contract or contracts and the terms and conditions thereof should not
402 be inquired into by the court and the validity of the terms thereof be determined and the
403 contract or contracts adjudicated as security for the payment of any such bonds of the
404 authority. The bonds when validated and the judgment of validation shall be final and
405 conclusive with respect to such bonds against the authority issuing the same, and any
406 municipality, county, authority, subdivision, or instrumentality of this state or the United
407 States government if a party to the validation proceedings, contracting with the said
408 Richmond Hill-Bryan County Airport Authority.
409 SECTION 24.
410 Venue and jurisdiction.
411 Any action to protect or enforce any rights under the provisions of this Act or any suit or
412 action against such authority shall be brought in the Superior Court of Bryan County,
413 Georgia, and any action pertaining to validation of any bonds issued under the provisions of
414 this Act shall likewise be brought in said court.
H. B. 763
- 18 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
415 SECTION 25.
416 Interest of bondholders protected.
417 While any of the bonds issued by the authority remain outstanding, the powers, duties, or
418 existence of said authority or of its officers, employees, or agents shall not be diminished or
419 impaired in any manner that will affect adversely the interest and rights of the holders of such
420 bonds, and no other entity, department, agency, or authority shall be created which will
421 compete with the authority to such an extent as to affect adversely the interest and rights of
422 the holders of such bonds and, upon the issuance of bonds hereunder, the provisions hereof
423 shall constitute a contract with the holders of such bonds.
424 SECTION 26.
425 Moneys received considered trust funds.
426 All moneys received pursuant to the authority of this Act, whether as proceeds from the sale
427 of revenue bonds, as grants or other contributions, or as revenues, income, fees, and earnings
428 shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this Act.
429 SECTION 27.
430 Purpose of the authority.
431 Without limiting the generality of any provisions of this Act, the general purpose of the
432 authority is declared to be that of acquiring, constructing, equipping, maintaining, improving,
433 and operating new public use, general aviation airports and landing fields for the use of
434 aircraft, including any related buildings and the usual and convenient facilities appertaining
435 to such undertakings and extensions and improvements of such facilities, acquiring the
436 necessary property therefor, both real and personal, and to lease or sell any or all of such
H. B. 763
- 19 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
437 facilities including real property, and to do any and all things deemed by the authority
438 necessary, convenient, or desirable for and incident to the efficient and proper development
439 and operation of such types of undertakings.
440 SECTION 28.
441 Rates, charges, and revenues; use.
442 The authority is authorized to prescribe and fix and collect rates, fees, tolls, and charges, and
443 to revise, from time to time, and collect such rates, fees, tolls, and charges for the services,
444 facilities, or commodities furnished, including leases, concessions, or subleases of its lands
445 or facilities in accordance with assurances set forth in airport improvement and assistance
446 agreements entered into between the authority and the Federal Aviation Administration, the
447 Georgia Department of Transportation, or the United States Department of Transportation.
448 This authority assumes no liability for obligations assumed by the Richmond Hill-Bryan
449 County Airport Authority under prior agreements entered into between the County of Bryan
450 or City of Richmond Hill with the Federal Aviation Administration. This authority shall
451 maintain a fee and rental structure for the use of its land and facilities sufficient to make any
452 airport or landing field operated by the authority as self-sustaining as possible under the
453 circumstances existing at the particular airport, consistent with the obligation to operate such
454 airports or landing fields for public use, on reasonable terms and without unjust
455 discrimination, to all types, kinds, and classes of aeronautical activities, including
456 commercial aeronautical activities offering services to the public at such airport or landing
457 field.
H. B. 763
- 20 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
458 SECTION 29.
459 Rules and regulations for operation of projects.
460 It shall be the duty of the authority to prescribe rules and regulations for the operation of the
461 project or projects constructed under the provisions of this Act, including the basis on which
462 airports and landing fields for the use of aircraft shall be furnished. Before undertaking
463 performance of any airport or landing field operations, the authority shall procure and
464 maintain in force at all times sufficient liability insurance covering aviation related risks for
465 their operations. At all times relevant hereto, the authority shall operate its airports and
466 landing fields in accordance with grant assurances entered into with the Federal Aviation
467 Administration, the Georgia Department of Transportation, or the United States Department
468 of Transportation.
469 SECTION 30.
470 Powers declared supplemental and additional.
471 The foregoing sections of this Act shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative
472 method for the doing of the things authorized thereby and shall be regarded as supplemental
473 and additional to powers conferred by other laws and shall not be regarded as in derogation
474 of any powers now existing.
475 SECTION 31.
476 Liberal construction of Act.
477 This Act being for the purpose of promoting the health, morals, and general welfare of the
478 citizens of the United States, of the State of Georgia, of Bryan County and of the City of
479 Richmond Hill shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes hereof.
H. B. 763
- 21 -

25 LC 62 0171/AP
480 SECTION 32.
481 Effective date.
482 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
483 without such approval.
484 SECTION 33.
485 Repealer.
486 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 763
- 22 -